Massachusetts, session 194th, H3125.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition is 
hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following section: 
Fifty-ninth. With respect to property owned by a privately owned public use airport listed 
in the current Statewide Airport System Plan, that portion of which is used for an airport, as 
defined in section 35 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, but not that portion of an airport that is 
exclusively non-aviation related.